Utah statutes.
41-4-9.   Persons violating provisions -- Penalty.
Any person who violates any of the provisions of this act, any person who is a
party to any agreement or understanding, or to any contract prescribing any
condition prohibited by this act, and any employee, agent or officer of any
such person who shall participate, in any manner, in making, executing,
enforcing, performing or in urging, aiding or abetting in the performance of
any such contract, condition, agreement or understanding and any person who
pays or gives or contracts to pay or give any thing or service of value
prohibited by this act, and any person who receives or accepts or contracts to
receive or accept any thing or service of value prohibited by this act, shall
be deemed guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by
a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $5,000, or be imprisoned not less
than six months nor more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
Each day's violation of this provision shall constitute a separate offense.
